src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!! Ojibwe verb stems                           
! ========================================================================== !


!! The verbs are analysed as follows:
!! * We split the Verb lexicon in 4 groups according to transitivity class
!! * For each group, we add the prefixes, and mark them with *flag diacritics* (the @ symbols)
!! * Then come the stems themselves
!! * Finally, come the suffixes, including flag diacritics
!!   to ensure that the correct prefixes and suffixes are matched together

!! Prefixes and suffixes are in affixes/verbs.lexc, whereas
!! the stems are in stems/verbs.lexc

!! The Ojibwe verbs are divided in four groups:

!! 1. IA: Intransitive animate
!! 1. II: Intransitive inanimate
!! 1. TA: Transitive animate
!! 1. TI: Transitive inanimate



!! The stems
!      =========


LEXICON IISTEM   !!= @CODE@ 

ozhaawashkwaa IICONJ "bleuir" ;
minomaagwad IICONJ "hs/she smells good" ;
gozigwan IICONJ "he/she/it is heavy" ;

!! TODO: these need morphology

LEXICON TASTEM_am   !!= @CODE@ 
aabaji':aabaji'     TACONJ_am       "use s.o." ;
abwaazh:abwaan      TACONJ_am       "roast s.o." ;
agoozh:agoon        TACONJ_am       "hang s.o." ;
amajwebin:amajwebin TACONJ_am       "shake s.o. awake" ;
ashi:as             TACONJ_am       "put s.o. down" ;
baabii':baabii'     TACONJ_am       "wait for s.o." ;
baashkiz:baashkizw  TACONJ_am       "shoot s.o." ;
    ! imbaashkizwaa
dakwam:dakwam       TACONJ_am       "bite s.o." ;
waabam:waabam       TACONJ_am       "see" ;

LEXICON TASTEM_aw   !!= @CODE@ 

aaniikanootaw:aanikanoot            TACONJ_am   "translate s.o." ;
ayaaw:aya                           TACONJ_am   "to know" ;
anishinaabemotaw:anishinaabemot     TACONJ_am   "to speak Ojibwe to s.o." ;
    ! indanishinaabemotawaa
amo:amw                             TACONJ_am   "to eat s.o." ;
    ! NOTE: indamwaa?
baakaakonamaw:baakaakonam           TACONJ_am   "open s.t. for s.o." ;
    ! nibaakaakonamawaa
baakinamaw:baakinam                 TACONJ_am   "uncover st for s.o." ;
    ! nibaakinamawa
bizindaw:bizind                     TACONJ_am   "listen (to s.o.?)" ;
    ! nibizindawaa
biizikaw:biizik                     TACONJ_am   "put s.o. on" ;
ininamaw:ininam                     TACONJ_am   "hand s.t. to s.o." ;
mikaw:mik                           TACONJ_am   "find s.o." ;
    ! nimikawaa
dazhiikaw:daazhik                   TACONJ_am   "work on s.o." ;



!! -zo passives

!! TODO: morphology for the -zo passives
